South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4294.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 12-6-1120 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (12) South Carolina gross income does not include retirement benefits received from the South Carolina Police Officers Retirement System or any other retirement benefits received by a police officer, firefighter, or emergency medical technician through a retirement system or pension. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----